Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 2. JUDICIAL BRANCH

SUBTITLE G. ATTORNEYS

CHAPTER 84. UNAUTHORIZED ATTORNEY COMPENSATION

Sec. 84.001. PROHIBITED ACTS. Before the conclusion of all aspects of a criminal matter that gives rise to an attorney's employment, an attorney may not make or negotiate an agreement with a client, a prospective client, or former client that provides the attorney literary or media rights to a portrayal or account based in substantial part on information relating to the representation.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 982, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 84.002. CRIMINAL OFFENSE. (a) A person commits an offense if, while acting as an attorney, the person agrees to accept as compensation for legal advice provided by the person in a criminal matter the right to publish, in print, film, or otherwise, the account of a crime or the events associated with a crime.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 982, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 84.003. CIVIL LIABILITY. (a) A person, including the victim of a crime or the estate of a victim of a crime, may bring suit against an attorney whose violation of Section 84.001 results in damages incurred by the person bringing the suit.

(b) A person who brings suit under this section is entitled to recover:

(1) actual damages caused to the person bringing the suit by the publication of the account of the crime;

(2) exemplary damages in an amount determined by the court;

(3) reasonable attorney's fees; and

(4) court costs.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 982, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 84.004. CUMULATIVE REMEDIES. This chapter is cumulative of other law under which a person may obtain judicial relief. An administrative, civil, or criminal action brought against an attorney based on a violation of this chapter does not limit or restrict another action against the attorney by the same or another person.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 982, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.